Alabama, session 2026rs, HB57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
the City of Carrollton in Pickens County are altered and
rearranged to include within the corporate limits of the
municipality, in addition to the lands now included, all of
the following territory:
PARCEL 1: Begin at a point on the West right-of-way of
the Carrollton-Pine Grove Mississippi State Line Road, which
point is 269 feet North of the Centerline of the Carrollton-
Pickensville Road; thence run North 3degrees 00' East along
said right-of-way of Carrollton-Pine Grove Mississippi State
Line Road for 225 feet; thence turn 90degrees left and run
North 87degrees 00' West for 198 feet; thence South 3 degrees
00' West for 225 feet; thence South 87degrees 00' East to the
Point of Beginning. Said Parcel One lies in the Northwest
Quarter of Southeast Quarter of Section 32, Township 20 South,
Range 15 West, Pickens County, Alabama, and contains one acre,
more or less.
PARCEL 2: Begin at a concrete right-of-way marker on
the West right-of-way of the Carrollton-Pine Grove Mississippi
State Line Road, which marker is 160 feet from the centerline
of the Carrollton-Pickensville Road; thence run North 3degrees
East along said West right-of-way of the Carrollton-Pine Grove
Mississippi State Line Road a distance of 109 feet; thence
Page 1

Mississippi State Line Road a distance of 109 feet; thence
HB57 Enrolled
turn 90degrees left and run 209 feet; thence turn 90degrees
left and run to the North right-of-way of Carrollton-
Pickensville Road; thence run Easterly along said North
right-of-way of Carrollton-Pickensville Road 109 feet to a
right-of-way concrete marker which is 140 feet West of the
centerline of the Carrollton-Pine Grove Mississippi Stateline
Road; thence run Northeasterly to the Point of Beginning. Said
land lying and being in the Northwest Quarter of Southeast
Quarter of Section 32, Township 20 South, Range 15 West,
containing 0.8 acre, more or less.
Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
be altered, rearranged, and extended from the City of
Carrollton is on file and open to public inspection in the
Office of the Judge of Probate in Pickens County, Alabama.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB57 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 29-Jan-26 Passed



Page 3